Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1306
Discharge of firearm at shooting
range; how treated.

No law, rule, regulation, ordinance, or resolution relating
to the discharge of a firearm at a shooting range with respect to any shooting
range existing and lawful shall be enforced by any city, county, village,
or other political subdivision, except as provided in section 37-1308, if
operated in compliance with the shooting range performance standards.

Laws 2009, LB503, § 6.